Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1181.
do enact as follows:AB1181,11Section 1. 121.91 (4) (o) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 121.91 (4) (o) 1. 2(intro.) and amended to read:AB1181,2,93121.91 (4) (o) 1. (intro.) Except as provided in subd. 1m., if a school board 4adopts a resolution to do so, the limit otherwise applicable to a school district under 5sub. (2m) in any school year is increased by the amount spent by the school district 6in that school year on a project to implement energy efficiency measures or to 7purchase energy efficiency products, including the payment of debt service on a 8bond or note issued, or a state trust fund loan obtained, to finance the project, if the 9project satisfies all of the following criteria:AB1181,2,1110a. The project results in the avoidance of, or reduction in, energy costs or 11operational costs, the.AB1181,2,1312b. The project is governed by a performance contract entered into under s. 1366.0133, and the.AB1181,2,1514d. The bond or note issued or state trust fund loan obtained to finance the 15project is issued for a term not exceeding 20 years.AB1181,3,411c. If a school board issues a bond or note or obtains a state trust fund loan to 2finance a project described in this subdivision subd. 1., a resolution adopted by a 3school board under this subdivision subd. 1. is valid for each school year in which 4the school board pays debt service on the bond, note, or state trust fund loan.AB1181,25Section 2. 121.91 (4) (o) 1. c. of the statutes is created to read:AB1181,3,86121.91 (4) (o) 1. c. The project is a facility alteration or training, service, or 7operations program designed to reduce energy consumption or operating costs, 8conserve water resources, or improve metering accuracy.AB1181,39Section 3. 121.91 (4) (o) 4. of the statutes is repealed.AB1181,410Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1181,3,1211(1) This act first applies to a resolution to increase a school district’s revenue 12limit under s. 121.91 (4) (o) that is adopted on the effective date of this subsection.AB1181,3,1313